Utah statutes.
78B-13-203.   Jurisdiction to modify determination.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 78B-13-204, a court of this state may
not modify a child custody determination made by a court of another state
unless a court of this state has jurisdiction to make an initial determination
under Subsection 78B-13-201(1)(a) or (b) and:
(1)  the court of the other state determines it no longer has exclusive,
continuing jurisdiction under Section 78B-13-202 or that a court of this state
would be a more convenient forum under Section 78B-13-207; or
(2)  a court of this state or a court of the other state determines that
neither the child, nor a parent, nor any person acting as a parent presently
resides in the other state.
